en: Fork, forks
bg: Вилица, вилици
da: Gaffel, gafler
de: Gabel, Gabeln
fr: Fourchette, fourchettes
hr: vilica
hu: villa, villák
it: forchetta, forchette, forchettina, forchettine
nl: Vork, vorken
pl: Widelec, widelce
pt: Garfo, garfos
sv: Gaffel

en: Spoon, spoons
bg: Лъжица, лъжици
da: Ske, skeer
de: Löffel
es: Cuchara, cucharas
fr: Cuillère, cuiller, cuillères, cuillers
hr: žlica
hu: kanál, kanalak
it: Cucchiaio, cucchiai
lt: Šaukštas, šaukštai
nl: lepel, lepels
pl: Łyżka, łyżki
pt: Colher, colheres
ro: Lingură, linguri
ru: Ложка, ложки
sv: Sked, skedar
tr: Kaşık, kaşıklar

en: teaspoon
bg: чаена лъжичка, чаена лъжица
da: teske, teskeer
de: Teelöffel
fr: cuillère à café
it: cucchiaino da tè
nl: theelepel
pl: Łyżeczki, Łyżeczka
sv: tesked, teskedar

en: tablespoon
bg: супена лъжица
da: spiseske, spiseskeer
de: Esslöffel
fr: cuillère à soupe
it: cucchiaino
nl: soeplepel
sv: matsked, matskedar

en: sheet, sheets, separator sheet
bg: лист, листа
de: Zwischenlage, Trennblatt
fr: feuille, feuilles, feuille intercalaire, feuilles intercalaires, Plaque / Intercalaire
hu: fólia, fóliák, lap, lapok
nl: blad, bladeren
pt: Folha, folhas

en: card
fr: carte, cartonnette
hu: kártya
nl: Kaart
pt: cartolina, cartolinas

en: backing, support, board, stand
bg: подплънка
de: Stütze, Unterlage
fi: tuki
fr: support, plaque, socle, cavalier, pick up, Cavalier / Cluster / Pick up
hr: potpora
hu: tartó, tábla, állvány
ia: supporto
it: supporto
mi: kaupapa
nl: drager
pt: suporte, placa, suportes, placas
ru: подкладка

en: Net, nets
bg: Мрежа, мрежи
cy: ffilm
de: Netz
fr: Filet, filets
hu: Háló, hálók
nl: Net, netje, netten, netjes
pl: Siatka, siatki
pt: Rede, redes, saco de rede, sacos de rede, sacos de redes, saco de redes

en: Film, wrap, films, wraps, film wrap, film wraps, foil
af: Foelie
ar: فِلْم
be: плёнка
bg: Фолио, слой
ca: Film
da: Film
de: Folie, Frischhaltefolie, Wickelfolie, Schrumpffolie, Film
el: Μεμβράνη
fr: Film, pellicule, films, pellicules, film de regroupement, Film / Enveloppage / Feuille / Housse
gd: film
gl: filme
he: קְרוּם
hi: फ़िल्म
hu: Film
hy: թաղանթ
is: skán
it: Film, Pellicola
ja: フィルム
lo: ຟີມ
nl: Folie, Film, Folies
pl: Folia, Film
pt: Película, películas, filme, filmes, filme extensível, filme estirável
ru: фильм
sh: фи̏лм, fȉlm
sv: Film
th: ฟิล์ม
ur: فلم
zh: 菲林

en: Overpack, overpacks
de: Umverpackung
fr: Suremballage, sur-emballage, suremballages, sur-emballages
hu: gyűjtőcsomag, gyűjtőcsomagolás, overpack
nl: oververpakking, oververpakkingen
pt: Sobreembalagem, sobre-embalagem, sobreembalagens, sobre-embalagens, sobrembalagens, sobrembalagens

en: Grouping package, grouping packages
de: Sammelpackung, Gebinde, Gruppierungspaket
fr: Emballage de regroupement, emballages de regroupement
hu: Csoportosító csomag, egyesítő csomag
nl: Groepsverpakking, groepsverpakkingen
pt: Embalagem de grupagem, embalagem de agrupagem, embalagens de grupagem, embalagens de agrupagem, embalagem agrupadora, embalagens agrupadoras

en: Seal, operculum, seals, peel-off lid
de: Siegelfolie, Deckelfolie, Abziehfolie, Abziehdeckel, Dichtung, Dichtungen
fr: Opercule, opercules, Opercule / Autre Fermeture Souple
hu: zárófedő
nl: Seal
pt: Tampo, tampos

en: bulk, without packaging, no packaging
bg: насипно, наливно, без амбалаж
da: uden emballage
de: ohne Verpackung, unverpackt
es: a granel, sin empaque, sin envase, sin embalaje
fr: vrac, sans emballage
hu: ömlesztett, csomagolás nélkül, csomagolás nélküli, csomagolatlan
it: alla rinfusa, senza imballaggio
ja: 包装なし, バルク
nl: zonder verpakking
pt: Granel, a granel, sem embalagem, sem embalagens
ru: весовой, без упаковки
zh: 散装, 无包装

en: Bowl, bowls
bg: Купа, купи
de: Schüssel
el: Μπολ
fr: Bol, bols
hu: Tál, tálak
nl: Schaal, Schaaltje, Schaaltjes, Vlootje, Vlootjes, Bak, Bakje, Bakjes, kom, kommen
pl: Miska, miski
pt: Tigela, taça, tigelas, taças

en: Plate, plates
bg: Чиния, чинии
de: Teller, Pappteller
fr: Assiette, assiettes
hr: tanjur
hu: tányér, tányérok
nl: Bord, Borden, Bordje
pl: Talerz, talerze
pt: Prato, pratos

en: Stick, sticks
de: Stäbchen, Rührstäbchen
fr: Batonnet, bâtonnets
hu: rúd, rudak
nl: Stok, stokken
pt: Paus, pauzinhos, varetas de madeira

en: Cosmetic stick
fr: Stick cosmétique

en: label, labels
bg: етикет, етикети
de: Etikett, Etiketten
fr: étiquette, étiquettes
hu: címke, címkék
nl: Label, labels
pl: Etykieta, etykiety
pt: Etiqueta, etiquetas, rótulo, rótulos

en: Applicator
fr: Applicateur
nl: Applicator

en: Bag-in-box
de: Bag-in-Box
fr: Bag-in-box, caisse-outre, Cubitainer, BIB
nl: Zak-in-doos